Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.110

Guaranty fund—Purpose.

The contributions of the incorporators, or trustees of any such savings bank under the provisions of RCW 32.08.100, and the sums credited thereto from its net earnings under the provisions of RCW 32.08.120, shall constitute a guaranty fund for the security of its depositors, and shall be held to meet any contingency or loss in its business from depreciation of its securities or otherwise, and for no other purpose except as provided in RCW 32.08.130, and RCW 32.12.090(5).

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.08.110. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 21; RRS s 3350.]